matxin-eng.eng.dix
        <pardef n="divide__VERB">
            <!-- Indicative -->
            <!-- Perfect -->
            <e>
                <p><l>ed</l><r>e</r></p>
                <par n="VERB"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Aspect=Perf|Mood=Ind</r></p>
                <par n="Number"/>
                <par n="Person"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin|Voice=Act</r></p>
            </e>

            <!-- Imperfect -->
            <e>
                <p><l>ing</l><r>e</r></p>
                <par n="VERB"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Aspect=Imp|Mood=Ind</r></p>
                <par n="Number"/>
                <par n="Person"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin|Voice=Act</r></p>
            </e>

            <!-- Present -->
            <e>
                <p><l>e</l><r>e</r></p>
                <par n="VERB"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=1|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin|Voice=Act</r></p>
            </e>
            <e>
                <p><l>e</l><r>e</r></p>
                <par n="VERB"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=2|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin|Voice=Act</r></p>
            </e>
            <e>
                <p><l>es</l><r>e</r></p>
                <par n="VERB"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=3|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin|Voice=Act</r></p>
            </e>
            <e>
                <p><l>e</l><r>e</r></p>
                <par n="VERB"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Mood=Ind|Number=Plur</r></p>
                <par n="Person"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin|Voice=Act</r></p>
            </e>

            <!-- Future Perfect -->
            <e>
                <p><l>ed</l><r>e</r></p>
                <par n="VERB"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Aspect=Perf|Mood=Ind</r></p>
                <par n="Number"/>
                <par n="Person"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Tense=Fut|VerbForm=Fin|Voice=Act</r></p>
            </e>

            <!-- Future -->
            <e>
                <p><l>e</l><r>e</r></p>
                <par n="VERB"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Mood=Ind</r></p>
                <par n="Number"/>
                <par n="Person"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Tense=Fut|VerbForm=Fin|Voice=Act</r></p>
            </e>

            <!-- Pluperfect -->
            <e>
                <p><l>ed</l><r>e</r></p>
                <par n="VERB"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Mood=Ind</r></p>
                <par n="Number"/>
                <par n="Person"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Tense=Pqp|VerbForm=Fin|Voice=Act</r></p>
            </e>

            <!-- Participles -->
            <e>
                <p><l>ed</l><r>e</r></p>
                <par n="VERB"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Aspect=Perf|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Part|Voice=Pass</r></p>
            </e>
        </pardef>
        <pardef n="part__NOUN">
            <e>
                <par n="NOUN"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Number=Sing</r></p>
            </e>
            <e>
                <p><l>s</l><r></r></p>
                <par n="NOUN"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Number=Plur</r></p>
            </e>
        </pardef>
        <pardef n="Belgae__NOUN">
            <e>
                <par n="NOUN"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Number=Plur</r></p>
            </e>
        </pardef>
        <pardef n="inhabit__VERB">
            <!-- Indicative -->
            <!-- Active -->
            <!-- Perfect -->
            <e>
                <p><l>ed</l><r></r></p>
                <par n="VERB"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Aspect=Perf|Mood=Ind</r></p>
                <par n="Number"/>
                <par n="Person"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin|Voice=Act</r></p>
            </e>

            <!-- Imperfect -->
            <e>
                <p><l>ing</l><r></r></p>
                <par n="VERB"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Aspect=Imp|Mood=Ind</r></p>
                <par n="Number"/>
                <par n="Person"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin|Voice=Act</r></p>
            </e>

            <!-- Present -->
            <e>
                <p><l></l><r></r></p>
                <par n="VERB"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=1|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin|Voice=Act</r></p>
            </e>
            <e>
                <p><l></l><r></r></p>
                <par n="VERB"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=2|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin|Voice=Act</r></p>
            </e>
            <e>
                <p><l>s</l><r></r></p>
                <par n="VERB"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=3|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin|Voice=Act</r></p>
            </e>
            <e>
                <p><l></l><r></r></p>
                <par n="VERB"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Mood=Ind|Number=Plur</r></p>
                <par n="Person"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin|Voice=Act</r></p>
            </e>

            <!-- Future Perfect -->
            <e>
                <p><l>ed</l><r></r></p>
                <par n="VERB"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Aspect=Perf|Mood=Ind</r></p>
                <par n="Number"/>
                <par n="Person"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Tense=Fut|VerbForm=Fin|Voice=Act</r></p>
            </e>

            <!-- Future -->
            <e>
                <p><l></l><r></r></p>
                <par n="VERB"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Mood=Ind</r></p>
                <par n="Number"/>
                <par n="Person"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Tense=Fut|VerbForm=Fin|Voice=Act</r></p>
            </e>

            <!-- Pluperfect -->
            <e>
                <p><l>ed</l><r></r></p>
                <par n="VERB"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Mood=Ind</r></p>
                <par n="Number"/>
                <par n="Person"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Tense=Pqp|VerbForm=Fin|Voice=Act</r></p>
            </e>

            <!-- Passive -->
            <!-- Present -->
            <e>
                <p><l>ed</l><r></r></p>
                <par n="VERB"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Mood=Ind</r></p>
                <par n="Number"/>
                <par n="Person"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin|Voice=Pass</r></p>
            </e>

            <!-- Participles -->
            <e>
                <p><l>ed</l><r></r></p>
                <par n="VERB"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Aspect=Perf|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Part|Voice=Pass</r></p>
            </e>
        </pardef>
        <pardef n="that__DET">
            <e>
                <p><l>at</l><r>at</r></p>
                <par n="DET"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Number=Sing</r></p>
            </e>
            <e>
                <p><l>ose</l><r>at</r></p>
                <par n="DET"/>
                <p><l></l><r>|Number=Plur</r></p>
            </e>
        </pardef>
    </pardefs>

        <e lm="divide"><i>divid</i><par n="divide__VERB"/></e>
        <e lm="part"><i>part</i><par n="part__NOUN"/></e>
        <e lm="Belgae"><i>Belgae</i><par n="Belgae__NOUN"/></e>
        <e lm="inhabit"><i>inhabit</i><par n="inhabit__VERB"/></e>
        <e lm="Aquitanians"><i>Aquitanian</i><par n="part__NOUN"/></e>
        <e lm="that"><i>th</i><par n="that__DET"/></e>
        <e lm="call"><i>call</i><par n="inhabit__VERB"/></e>
        <e lm="Celts"><i>Celt</i><par n="part__NOUN"/></e>
        <e lm="language"><i>language</i><par n="part__NOUN"/></e>
        <e lm="Gauls"><i>Gaul</i><par n="part__NOUN"/></e>
